Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-634
Payment cards; prohibited acts relating to scanning device or encoding machine; violation; penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for a person to intentionally and knowingly:

(a) Use a scanning device to access, read, scan, obtain, memorize, or store, temporarily or permanently, information encoded on a payment card without the permission of the authorized user of the payment card, the issuer of the authorized user's payment card, or a merchant;

(b) Possess a scanning device with the intent to obtain information encoded on a payment card without the permission of the authorized user, the issuer of the authorized user’s payment card, or a merchant or possess a scanning device with knowledge that some other person intends to use the scanning device to obtain information encoded on a payment card without the permission of the authorized user, the issuer of the authorized user’s payment card, or a merchant;

(c) Use an encoding machine to place information encoded on a payment card onto a different card without the permission of the authorized user of the card from which the information was obtained, the issuer of the authorized user's payment card, or a merchant; or

(d) Possess an encoding machine with the intent to place information encoded on a payment card onto a different payment card without the permission of the user, the issuer of the authorized user’s payment card, or a merchant.

(2) A violation of this section is a Class IV felony for the first offense and a Class IIIA felony for a second or subsequent offense.

Laws 2002, LB 276, § 6;

Laws 2018, LB773, § 2.